Illinois, session 104th, HB4365.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Natural Resources Act is 5amended by changing Section 5-10 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 801/5-10)7    Sec. 5-10. Additional powers. With respect to the water 8resources of the State, the Office of Water Resources shall 9have the following powers:10    (a) To study and investigate ways and means by which the 11various water uses may be coordinated to the end that the water 12resources of the State be put to their maximum beneficial use 13and, in connection therewith, to request any department or 14agency of the State to make surveys, studies, investigations, 15prepare plans, reports and furnish such data and information 16as may be necessary.17    (b) To coordinate, determine and provide ways and means 18for the equitable reconciliation and adjustment of the various 19conflicting claims and rights to water by users or uses.20    (c) To recommend legislation for the most feasible method 21or methods of conserving water resources and putting them to 22the maximum possible use, taking into account the problems of 23navigation, flood control, river flow control and   HB4365 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1stabilization, reclamation, drainage and recapture, and 2further utilization of water after use for any purpose, 3domestic and industrial use, irrigation of land, municipal 4use, development of electric energy, public health, 5recreational, fish and game life, and other beneficial use.6    (d) To undertake regulatory flood hazard mapping within 7this State.8    (e) To inspect and prescribe standards of repair, 9maintenance and improvement of the facilities and properties 10of the Metro-East Flood Prevention District Metro-East 11Sanitary District.12(Source: P.A. 89-445, eff. 2-7-96; 90-14, eff. 7-1-97.) 13    Section 10. The Flood Prevention District Act is amended 14by changing Section 40 as follows: 15    (70 ILCS 750/40)16    Sec. 40. Budget of the District. The District shall adopt 17an annual budget by August 31 of each year for the fiscal year 18beginning October 1. Such budget shall include expected 19revenues by source and expenditures by project or by function 20for the following year. The budget must be approved by the 21county board of the county in which the district is situated 22prior to any expenditure by the District for the fiscal year 23beginning October 1. The county board must approve or 24disapprove the budget of the District within 30 calendar days   HB4365 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1after the budget is received by the county board. If the county 2board does not act to approve or disapprove the budget within 330 calendar days of receipt, it shall stand as approved.4    In addition, the District shall submit an annual report to 5the county board by August 31 of each year detailing the 6activities of the district. This report must also include any 7information submitted to the flood prevention district by a 8drainage, levee, or sanitary district in accordance with 9Section 4-45 of the Illinois Drainage Code or Section 2-2 of 10the Metro-East Flood Prevention District Act Metro-East 11Sanitary District Act.12(Source: P.A. 95-719, eff. 5-21-08; 95-723, eff. 6-23-08.) 13    Section 15. The Southwestern Illinois Metropolitan and 14Regional Planning Act is amended by changing Section 5 as 15follows: 16    (70 ILCS 1710/5)  (from Ch. 85, par. 1155)17    Sec. 5. The corporate authorities of the Southwestern 18Illinois Metropolitan and Regional Planning Commission shall 19consist of commissioners selected as follows: 20        Eight commissioners appointed by the Governor, at 21    least 4 of whom shall be elected officials of a unit of 22    government and at least 7 of whom shall be residents of the 23    Metropolitan and Regional Counties Area. No more than 4 of 24    the Governor's appointees shall be of the same political   HB4365 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    party. 2        One member from among the Illinois Commissioners of 3    the Bi-State Development Agency, elected by said 4    commissioners of said Agency, provided that preference 5    shall be given in this appointment to the Chairman or Vice 6    Chairman of said Agency if either or both of those 7    officers is an Illinois resident. 8        The Chairman or presiding officer of each statutory 9    Port District existing or operating within the 10    Metropolitan and Regional Counties Area, or a member of 11    the governing board of each such Port District appointed 12    by the Chairman or presiding officer thereof to serve in 13    his stead. 14        The President of the Metro-East Flood Prevention 15    District Metro-East Sanitary District or a member of the 16    governing board of such District appointed by the 17    President thereto to serve in his stead. 18        Two members from each of the county boards of counties 19    within the Area of operation having a population of less 20    than 100,000, such members to be appointed by the chairman 21    or presiding officer of such counties and in such manner 22    that one of the 2 members so appointed is the chairman or 23    presiding officer of the relevant county board or an 24    elected member of such board appointed to serve in the 25    stead of such chairman or presiding officer. 26        Three members from each of the county boards of   HB4365 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    counties within the Area of operation having a population 2    in excess of 100,000, such members to be appointed by the 3    chairman or presiding officer of such counties and in such 4    manner that one of the 3 members so appointed is the 5    chairman or presiding officer of the relevant county board 6    or an elected member of such board appointed to serve in 7    the stead of such chairman or presiding officer; provided, 8    further, that at least one member so appointed from each 9    county having a population in excess of 100,000 shall be a 10    resident in an area of such county outside any city, 11    village or incorporated town, and at least one member so 12    appointed from such counties shall be a resident of a 13    city, village or incorporated town of such county. 14        The Mayor or Village Board President from each city, 15    village or incorporated town in the Area of operation 16    having 4,500 or more inhabitants, or a member of the 17    Council or Village Board appointed by such Mayor or Board 18    President to serve in his stead. 19        One Mayor or Village Board President in each county 20    within the Area of operation from a city, village or 21    incorporated town having fewer than 4,500 inhabitants to 22    be selected by all Mayors or Village Board Presidents of 23    such cities, villages or incorporated towns in each such 24    county. 25        Two members from each township-organized county in the 26    Area of operation who shall be township supervisors   HB4365 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    appointed by the Chairman of the relevant county board in 2    such a manner that one of the 2 shall represent a township 3    having fewer than 4,500 inhabitants and one of the 2 shall 4    represent a township having more than 4,500 inhabitants, 5    provided that in the event no township in any such county 6    has in excess of 4,500 inhabitants the supervisor of the 7    township in such county which has the largest number of 8    inhabitants shall be one of the 2 members so appointed by 9    that county. 10        Two members from each commission-organized county in 11    the Area of operation who shall be elected officials of 12    either the county board or of a unit of government in such 13    county and who shall be appointed by the Chairman of the 14    County Board of such county. 15        The President of the Southwestern Illinois Council of 16    Mayors or a Mayor of a community within the Area of 17    operation appointed by such President to serve in his 18    stead. 19        One member from among the Illinois members of the 20    East-West Gateway Coordinating Council, elected by said 21    members of said council, provided preference shall be 22    given in this appointment to the Chairman or Vice Chairman 23    of said Council if either or both of those officers is an 24    Illinois resident.25    Each selecting authority shall give notice of his, or her, 26or its selections to each other selecting authority, to the   HB4365 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1Executive Director of the Commission, and to the Secretary of 2State. Selections or appointments to be made for the first 3time pursuant to this amendatory Act of 1975 shall be made no 4later than October 1, 1975 and notice given thereon by that 5date.6    In addition to the commissioners provided for above, the 7following shall also be commissioners selected or appointed 8and notice thereon given as contemplated by the preceding 9paragraph: 10        Two members from each county in the Area of operation 11    who shall be a chairman of a county planning commission, a 12    chairman of a municipal planning commission, or a county 13    engineer, such members to be appointed by the Chairman of 14    the County Board. 15        The regional superintendent of schools for each 16    educational service region located in whole or in part 17    within the Area of operation. 18        The President of Southern Illinois University at 19    Edwardsville or a person appointed by him to serve in his 20    stead. 21        The Director of Commerce and Economic Opportunity or a 22    person appointed by him to serve in his stead. 23        The district highway engineer for the Illinois 24    Department of Transportation. 25        The Chairman of the Southwestern Illinois Council on 26    Economic Development composed of the Counties of Madison,   HB4365 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    St. Clair, Monroe, Randolph, Washington, Bond and Clinton. 2        One representative from each County within the Area of 3    operation who shall be other than an elected official and 4    who shall be appointed by the Chairman of each County 5    Board, provided that each representative so appointed 6    shall be from disadvantaged or minority groups within the 7    County's population. 8        Five Commissioners, appointed by the President of the 9    Commission, with the concurrence of the Executive 10    Committee, one to be selected from each of 5 civic, 11    fraternal, cultural or religious organizations which meet 12    all of the following criteria: 13            (1) has a written charter or constitution and 14        written bylaws; 15            (2) has filed or is eligible to file articles of 16        incorporation pursuant to the General Not for Profit 17        Corporation Act; 18            (3) has been in existence for at least 5 years; and 19            (4) is generally recognized as being substantially 20        representative of the minority population within the 21        Commission's area of operation.22    The Commission shall develop a fair and reasonable 23procedure for determining the organizations from which 24appointments will be made.25    Within 30 days after selection and before entering upon 26the duties of his or her office, each commissioner shall take   HB4365 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1and subscribe to the constitutional oath of office and file it 2with the Secretary of State.3    The Commission shall maintain a level of minority 4membership equal to or greater than proportionate level of 5minority population which exists within the area of the 6Commission.7(Source: P.A. 94-793, eff. 5-19-06.) 8    Section 20. The Sanitary District Act of 1907 is amended 9by changing Sections 29. 29.1, and 29.3 as follows: 10    (70 ILCS 2205/29)  (from Ch. 42, par. 274.1)11    Sec. 29. Any sanitary district organized and operated 12under this Act and having an equalized assessed valuation for 13tax purposes of $100,000,000 or more may, by referendum as 14provided in Sections 29.1 through 29.3, be dissolved and a new 15district created in accordance with the Metro-East Flood 16Prevention District Act "Metro-East Sanitary District Act of 171974", enacted by the 78th General Assembly.18(Source: P.A. 78-1017.) 19    (70 ILCS 2205/29.1)  (from Ch. 42, par. 274.2)20    Sec. 29.1. When a petition, signed by at least 300 21registered voters residing within such sanitary district is 22filed with the State Board of Elections before the November 23general election in an even-numbered year, and within the time   HB4365 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1provided in the general election law, but other than a year in 2which a regular election for trustees of the district is held, 3requesting that the proposition that that sanitary district be 4dissolved and be replaced by a sanitary district organized 5under the Metro-East Flood Prevention District Act Metro-East 6Sanitary District Act of 1974, the Board shall certify the 7proposition to the proper election officials who shall submit 8the proposition to the voters of the district at that general 9election in accordance with the general election law. The 10proposition shall be in substantially the following form:11    Shall the.... Sanitary District be dissolved and be 12replaced by a sanitary district organized under the Metro-East 13Flood Prevention District Act Metro-East Sanitary District Act 14of 1974?15(Source: P.A. 81-1489.) 16    (70 ILCS 2205/29.3)  (from Ch. 42, par. 274.4)17    Sec. 29.3. The State Board of Elections shall proclaim and 18certify the results of the vote on the proposition. If a 19majority of those electors properly marking ballots on the 20proposition vote in favor thereof, the district organized 21under this Act shall be dissolved, effective upon the 22expiration of the terms of office of the incumbent trustees, 23and a new district created as provided in Article I of the 24Metro-East Flood Prevention District Act Metro-East Sanitary 25District Act of 1974.  HB4365 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1(Source: P.A. 78-1017.) 2    Section 25. The North Shore Water Reclamation District Act 3is amended by changing Section 19.1 as follows: 4    (70 ILCS 2305/19.1)  (from Ch. 42, par. 295.1)5    Sec. 19.1. Acquiring district or municipal treatment 6works. 7    (a) After incorporation, any district organized under this 8Act may, in accordance with this Act and an intergovernmental 9agreement with the sanitary district being acquired or the 10municipality from whom the treatment works and lines are to be 11acquired, acquire the territory, treatment works, lines, 12appurtenances, and other property of (i) any sanitary district 13organized under this Act, the Sanitary District Act of 1907, 14the Sanitary District Act of 1917, the Sanitary District Act 15of 1936, or the Metro-East Flood Prevention District Act 16Metro-East Sanitary District Act of 1974 or (ii) any 17municipality whose treatment works were established under the 18Illinois Municipal Code or the Municipal Wastewater Disposal 19Zones Act, regardless of whether that district or municipality 20is contiguous to the acquiring sanitary district. The distance 21between the sanitary district being acquired or municipality 22and the acquiring sanitary district, however, as measured 23between the points on their corporate boundaries that are 24nearest to each other, shall not exceed 20 miles. In the case   HB4365 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1of a municipality, only that property used by the municipality 2for transport, treatment, and discharge of wastewater and for 3disposal of sewage sludge shall be transferred to the 4acquiring sanitary district.5    (b) The board of trustees of the sanitary district being 6acquired, or the corporate authorities of a municipality whose 7treatment works is being acquired, shall, jointly with the 8board of trustees of the acquiring sanitary district, petition 9the circuit court of the county containing all or the larger 10portion of the sanitary district being acquired or the 11municipality to permit the acquisition. The petition shall 12show the following: 13        (1) The reason for the acquisition. 14        (2) That there are no debts of the sanitary district 15    being acquired or municipality outstanding, or that there 16    are sufficient funds on hand or available to satisfy those 17    debts. 18        (3) That no contract or federal or State permit or 19    grant will be impaired by the acquisition. 20        (4) That all assets and responsibilities of the 21    sanitary district being acquired or municipality, as they 22    relate to wastewater treatment, have been properly 23    assigned to the acquiring sanitary district. 24        (5) That the acquiring sanitary district will pay any 25    court costs incurred in connection with the petition. 26        (6) The boundaries of the acquired sanitary district   HB4365 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    or municipality as of the date of the petition.2    (c) Upon adequate notice, including appropriate notice to 3the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency, the circuit 4court shall hold a hearing to determine whether there is good 5cause for the acquisition by the acquiring district and 6whether the allegations of the petition are true. If the court 7finds that there is good cause and that the allegations are 8true, it shall order the acquisition to proceed. If the court 9finds that there is not good cause for the acquisition or that 10the allegations of the petition are not true, the court shall 11dismiss the petition. In either event, the costs shall be 12taxed against the acquiring sanitary district. The order shall 13be final. Separate or joint appeals may be taken by any party 14affected by the order as in other civil cases.15    (d) If the court orders the acquisition contemplated in 16the petition, there shall be no further appointments of 17trustees if the acquired agency is a sanitary district. The 18trustees of the acquired sanitary district acting at the time 19of the order shall close up the business affairs of the 20sanitary district and make the necessary conveyances of title 21to the sanitary district property in accordance with the 22intergovernmental agreement between the acquiring and acquired 23sanitary districts. In the case of a municipality, the 24governing body of the municipality shall make the necessary 25conveyances of title to municipal property to the acquiring 26sanitary district in accordance with the intergovernmental   HB4365 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1agreement between the municipality and the acquiring sanitary 2district. The acquiring sanitary district's ordinances shall 3take effect in the acquired territory upon entry of the order.4    (e) The acquisition of any sanitary district by another 5sanitary district or the acquisition of a treatment works from 6a municipality by another sanitary district shall not affect 7the obligation of any bonds issued or contracts entered into 8by the acquired sanitary district or the municipality, nor 9invalidate the levy, extension, or collection of any taxes or 10special assessments upon a property in the acquired sanitary 11district, but all those bonds and contracts shall be 12discharged. The general obligation indebtedness of the 13acquired sanitary district shall be paid from the proceeds of 14continuing taxes and special assessments as provided in this 15Act.16    All money remaining after the business affairs of the 17acquired sanitary district or acquired treatment works of the 18municipality have been closed up and all debts and obligations 19of the entities paid shall be paid to the acquiring sanitary 20district in accordance with the intergovernmental agreement 21between the parties.22    (f) The board of trustees of the acquiring sanitary 23district required to provide sewer service under this Act may 24levy and collect, for that purpose, a tax on the taxable 25property within that district. The aggregate amount of the tax 26shall be as provided in this Act.  HB4365 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    (g) Any intergovernmental agreement entered into by the 2parties under this Section shall provide for the imposition or 3continuance of a user charge system in accordance with the 4acquiring district's ordinance, the Illinois Environmental 5Protection Act, and the federal Clean Water Act.6    (h) All courts shall take judicial notice of the 7acquisition of the sanitary district being acquired or 8municipal treatment works by the acquiring sanitary district.9(Source: P.A. 87-1060.) 10    Section 30. The Sanitary District Act of 1917 is amended 11by changing Sections 1 and 17.1 as follows: 12    (70 ILCS 2405/1)  (from Ch. 42, par. 299)13    Sec. 1. Whenever any area of contiguous territory shall 14contain one or more incorporated cities, towns or villages or 15parts of one or more incorporated cities, towns or villages, 16and shall be so situated that the construction and maintenance 17of a plant or plants for the purification and treatment of 18sewage and the maintenance of one or more outlets for the 19drainage thereof, after having been so treated and purified by 20and through such plant or plants will conduce to the 21preservation of the public health, comfort and convenience, 22the same may be incorporated as a sanitary district under this 23Act in the manner following:24    Any 100 legal voters, resident within the limits of such   HB4365 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1proposed sanitary district, may petition the Circuit Court in 2the county in which the proposed district or the major portion 3thereof is located, to cause the question to be submitted to 4the legal voters of such proposed district whether such 5proposed territory shall be organized as a sanitary district 6under this Act, such petition shall be addressed to the 7Circuit Court and shall contain a definite description of the 8territory to be embraced in such district, and the name of such 9proposed sanitary district: However, no territory shall be 10included in any municipal corporation formed hereunder which 11is not situated within the limits of a city, incorporated town 12or village, or within 6 miles outside thereof, and no 13territory shall be included within more than one sanitary 14district organized under this Act or any other Act, except 15that territory included within a sanitary district organized 16under the Metro-East Flood Prevention District Act Metro-East 17Sanitary District Act of 1974 may also be included within a 18sanitary district organized under this Act. Upon filing of 19such petition in the office of the circuit clerk in the county 20in which such territory or the major portion thereof is 21situated, it shall be the duty of the Circuit Court to name 3 22judges of such Court who shall constitute a board of 23commissioners which shall have power and authority to consider 24the boundaries of any such proposed sanitary district, whether 25the same shall be as described in such petition or otherwise, 26and the decision of 2 of such commissioners shall be   HB4365 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1conclusive and not subject to review in any manner, directly 2or indirectly.3    Notice shall be given by such court of the time and place 4where such commissioners will meet, by a publication inserted 5in one or more daily or weekly papers published in such 6proposed district, at least 20 days prior to such meeting and 7if no such newspaper is published in such proposed district, 8then by posting at least 5 copies of such notice in such 9proposed district at least 20 days before such hearing.10    At such meeting all persons in such proposed district 11shall have an opportunity to be heard touching the location 12and boundary of such proposed district and to make suggestions 13regarding the same, and such commissioners, after hearing 14statements, evidence and suggestions, shall fix and determine 15the limits and boundaries of such proposed district, and for 16that purpose and to that extent may alter and amend such 17petition. After such determination by the commissioners or a 18majority of them, the same shall be incorporated in an order 19which shall be entered of record in the Circuit Court. Upon the 20entering of such order, the Circuit Court shall certify the 21question to the proper election officials who shall submit the 22question of organization and establishment of the proposed 23sanitary district as determined by the commissioners, at an 24election in accordance with the general election law.25    Each legal voter resident within such proposed sanitary 26district shall have the right to cast a ballot at such   HB4365 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1election. The proposition shall be in substantially the 2following form:3---------------------------------------------- 4    For Sanitary District 5------------------------------------------------------------- 6    Against Sanitary District 7-------------------------------------------------------------8    The Circuit Court shall cause a statement of the result of 9such election to be entered of record in the Circuit Court. If 10a majority of the votes cast upon the question of 11incorporation of the proposed sanitary district shall be in 12favor of the proposed sanitary district, such proposed 13district shall thenceforth be deemed an organized sanitary 14district under this Act.15(Source: P.A. 83-1425.) 16    (70 ILCS 2405/17.1)  (from Ch. 42, par. 316.1)17    Sec. 17.1. Acquiring district or municipal treatment 18works.19    (a) After incorporation, any district organized under this 20Act may, in accordance with this Act and an intergovernmental 21agreement with the sanitary district being acquired or the 22municipality from whom the treatment works and lines are to be 23acquired, acquire the territory, treatment works, lines, 24appurtenances, and other property of (i) any sanitary district 25organized under this Act, the Sanitary District Act of 1907,   HB4365 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1the North Shore Water Reclamation District Act, the Sanitary 2District Act of 1936, or the Metro-East Flood Prevention 3District Act Metro-East Sanitary District Act of 1974 or (ii) 4any municipality whose treatment works were established under 5the Illinois Municipal Code or the Municipal Wastewater 6Disposal Zones Act, regardless of whether that district or 7municipality is contiguous to the acquiring sanitary district. 8The distance between the sanitary district being acquired or 9municipality and the acquiring sanitary district, however, as 10measured between the points on their corporate boundaries that 11are nearest to each other, shall not exceed 20 miles. In the 12case of a municipality, only that property used by the 13municipality for transport, treatment, and discharge of 14wastewater and for disposal of sewage sludge shall be 15transferred to the acquiring sanitary district.16    (b) The board of trustees of the sanitary district being 17acquired, or the corporate authorities of a municipality whose 18treatment works is being acquired, shall, jointly with the 19board of trustees of the acquiring sanitary district, petition 20the circuit court of the county containing all or the larger 21portion of the sanitary district being acquired or the 22municipality to permit the acquisition. The petition shall 23show the following:24        (1) The reason for the acquisition.25        (2) That there are no debts of the sanitary district 26    being acquired or municipality outstanding, or that there   HB4365 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    are sufficient funds on hand or available to satisfy those 2    debts.3        (3) That no contract or federal or State permit or 4    grant will be impaired by the acquisition.5        (4) That all assets and responsibilities of the 6    sanitary district being acquired or municipality, as they 7    relate to wastewater treatment, have been properly 8    assigned to the acquiring sanitary district.9        (5) That the acquiring sanitary district will pay any 10    court costs incurred in connection with the petition.11        (6) The boundaries of the acquired sanitary district 12    or municipality as of the date of the petition.13    (c) Upon adequate notice, including appropriate notice to 14the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency, the circuit 15court shall hold a hearing to determine whether there is good 16cause for the acquisition by the acquiring district and 17whether the allegations of the petition are true. If the court 18finds that there is good cause and that the allegations are 19true, it shall order the acquisition to proceed. If the court 20finds that there is not good cause for the acquisition or that 21the allegations of the petition are not true, the court shall 22dismiss the petition. In either event, the costs shall be 23taxed against the acquiring sanitary district. The order shall 24be final. Separate or joint appeals may be taken by any party 25affected by the order as in other civil cases.26    (d) If the court orders the acquisition contemplated in   HB4365 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1the petition, there shall be no further appointments of 2trustees if the acquired agency is a sanitary district. The 3trustees of the acquired sanitary district acting at the time 4of the order shall close up the business affairs of the 5sanitary district and make the necessary conveyances of title 6to the sanitary district property in accordance with the 7intergovernmental agreement between the acquiring and acquired 8sanitary districts. In the case of a municipality, the 9governing body of the municipality shall make the necessary 10conveyances of title to municipal property to the acquiring 11sanitary district in accordance with the intergovernmental 12agreement between the municipality and the acquiring sanitary 13district. The acquiring sanitary district's ordinances take 14effect in the acquired territory upon entry of the order.15    (e) The acquisition of any sanitary district by another 16sanitary district or the acquisition of a treatment works from 17a municipality by another sanitary district shall not affect 18the obligation of any bonds issued or contracts entered into 19by the acquired sanitary district or the municipality, nor 20invalidate the levy, extension, or collection of any taxes or 21special assessments upon a property in the acquired sanitary 22district, but all those bonds and contracts shall be 23discharged. The general obligation indebtedness of the 24acquired sanitary district shall be paid from the proceeds of 25continuing taxes and special assessments as provided in this 26Act.  HB4365 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    All money remaining after the business affairs of the 2acquired sanitary district or acquired treatment works of the 3municipality have been closed up and all debts and obligations 4of the entities paid shall be paid to the acquiring sanitary 5district in accordance with the intergovernmental agreement 6between the parties.7    (f) The board of trustees of the acquiring sanitary 8district required to provide sewer service under this Act may 9levy and collect, for that purpose, a tax on the taxable 10property within that district. The aggregate amount of the tax 11shall be as provided in this Act.12    (g) Any intergovernmental agreement entered into by the 13parties under this Section shall provide for the imposition or 14continuance of a user charge system in accordance with the 15acquiring district's ordinance, the Illinois Environmental 16Protection Act, and the federal Clean Water Act.17    (h) All courts shall take judicial notice of the 18acquisition of the sanitary district being acquired or 19municipal treatment works by the acquiring sanitary district.20(Source: P.A. 99-669, eff. 7-29-16.) 21    Section 35. The Metro-East Sanitary District Act of 1974 22is amended by changing the Act title and Sections 1-1, 3-1, and 235-1 as follows: 24    (70 ILCS 2905/Act title)  HB4365 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    An Act concerning local government authorizing the 2reorganization of certain sanitary districts. 3    (70 ILCS 2905/1-1)  (from Ch. 42, par. 501-1)4    Sec. 1-1. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 5Metro-East Flood Prevention District Act "Metro-East Sanitary 6District Act of 1974".7(Source: P.A. 78-1017.) 8    (70 ILCS 2905/3-1)  (from Ch. 42, par. 503-1)9    Sec. 3-1. The district shall be governed by a Board of 10Commissioners, consisting of 5 commissioners. Two of the 11commissioners shall be residents of that portion of the 12district in the county having the greater equalized assessed 13valuation within the district's boundaries of the district, 14and 2 shall be residents of that portion of the district within 15in the other county. The appointment of commissioners from 16each county shall be made by the chairman of the county board 17of that county with the advice and consent of the county board, 18except that in the case of a home rule county as defined by 19Article VII, Section 6, of the Constitution of 1970 the 20appointment shall be made by the chief executive officer of 21the county with the advice and consent of the county board. 22Beginning on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 23101st General Assembly, the mayor, or his or her designee, of 24the largest municipality in the county having the greater   HB4365 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1equalized assessed valuation within the district's boundaries 2of the district shall be an ex officio commissioner with a 3right to vote. If there is not a vacant commissioner position 4from the county having the greater equalized assessed 5valuation on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 6101st General Assembly, then the term of the last appointed 7commissioner from that county is terminated on the effective 8date of this amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly.9    The appointed commissioners from each county may not be 10from the same political party.11    The County Board Chairman of either county may remove any 12of the appointed commissioners from his or her county with the 13advice and consent of the county board. 14    In the first appointments to the Board of Commissioners, 15the appointing authority appointing 3 directors shall 16designate one appointee to serve for a term of one year, one 17for a term of 3 years and one for a term of 5 years, and the 18appointing authority appointing 2 directors shall designate 19one to serve for a term of 2 years and one for a term of 4 20years. Thereafter one commissioner shall be appointed by the 21appropriate appointing authority each year for a term of 5 22years to succeed the director whose term expires in that year. 23Any vacancy on the Board of Commissioners shall be filled by 24appointment by the appropriate appointing authority for the 25remainder of the unexpired term.26    For the purpose of determining the ex officio   HB4365 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1commissioner, the county having the greater equalized assessed 2valuation of the district shall be established on January 1 of 3each year, and the ex officio commissioner shall serve until 4January 1 of the following year.5(Source: P.A. 101-308, eff. 1-1-20.) 6    (70 ILCS 2905/5-1)  (from Ch. 42, par. 505-1)7    Sec. 5-1. Taxes; levy. 8    (a) The board may levy and collect taxes for corporate 9purposes on taxable property within the corporate boundaries 10of the district including property annexed pursuant to Section 112-11. Such taxes shall be levied by ordinance specifying the 12purposes for which the same are required, and a certified copy 13of such ordinance shall be filed with the county clerk of the 14county in which the predecessor district was organized, on or 15before the second Tuesday in August, as provided in Section 16122 of the Revenue Act of 1939 (superseded by Section 14-10 of 17the Property Tax Code). Any excess funds accumulated prior to 18January 1, 2008 by the sanitary district that are collected by 19levying taxes pursuant to 745 ILCS 10/9-107 may be expended by 20the sanitary district to maintain, repair, improve, or 21construct levees or any part of the levee system and to provide 22capital moneys for levee or river-related scientific studies, 23including the construction of facilities for such purposes. 24For the purposes of this subsection (a), the excess funds 25withdrawn from the Local Governmental and Governmental   HB4365 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1Employees Tort Immunity Fund may not be more than 90% of the 2balance of that fund on December 31, 2007. After the 3assessment for the current year has been equalized by the 4Department of Revenue, the board shall, as soon as may be, 5ascertain and certify to such county clerk the total value of 6all taxable property lying within the corporate limits of such 7districts in each of the counties in which the district is 8situated, as the same is assessed and equalized for tax 9purposes for the current year. The county clerk shall 10ascertain the rate per cent which, upon the total valuation of 11all such property, ascertained as above stated, would produce 12a net amount not less than the amount so directed to be levied; 13and the clerk shall, without delay, certify under his 14signature and seal of office to the county clerk of such other 15county, in which a portion of the district is situated such 16rate per cent; and it shall be the duty of each of the county 17clerks to extend such tax in a separate column upon the books 18of the collector or collectors of the county taxes for the 19counties, against all property in their respective counties, 20within the limits of the district. All taxes so levied and 21certified shall be collected and enforced in the same manner, 22and by the same officers as county taxes, and shall be paid 23over by the officers collecting the same, to the treasurer of 24the sanitary district, in the manner and at the time provided 25by the Property Tax Code. The aggregate amount of taxes levied 26for any one year, exclusive of the amount levied for the   HB4365 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1payment of bonded indebtedness and interest thereon, shall not 2exceed the rate of .20%, or the rate limitation of the 3predecessor district in effect on July 1, 1967, or the rate 4limitation set by subsection (b) whichever is greater, of 5value, as equalized or assessed by the Department of Revenue. 6The foregoing limitations upon tax rates may be increased or 7decreased under the referendum provisions of the Property Tax 8Code.9    (b) The tax rate limit of the district may be changed to 10.478% of the value of property as equalized or assessed by the 11Department of Revenue for a period of 5 years and to .312% of 12such value thereafter upon the approval of the electors of the 13district of such a proposition submitted at any regular 14election pursuant to a resolution of the board of 15commissioners or submitted at an election for officers of the 16counties of St. Clair and Madison in accordance with the 17general election law upon a petition signed by not fewer than 1810% of the legal voters in the district, which percentage 19shall be determined on the basis of the number of votes cast at 20the last general election preceding the filing of such 21petition specifying the tax rate to be submitted. Such 22petition shall be filed with the executive director of the 23district not more than 10 months nor less than 5 months prior 24to the election at which the question is to be submitted to the 25voters of the district, and its validity shall be determined 26as provided by the general election law. The executive   HB4365 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1director shall certify the question to the proper election 2officials, who shall submit the question to the voters. 3    Notice shall be given in the manner provided by the 4general election law.5    Referenda initiated under this subsection shall be subject 6to the provisions and limitations of the general election law.7    The question shall be in substantially the following form:8- 9    Shall the maximum tax rate 10for the Metro-East Flood Prevention District Metro-East  11Sanitary 12District be established at                  YES 13.478% of the equalized assessed 14value for 5 years and then at .312%   ----------------------- 15of the equalized assessed value 16thereafter, instead of .2168%, the          NO 17maximum rate otherwise applicable 18to the next taxes to be extended? 19-------------------------------------------------------------20    The ballot shall have printed thereon, but not as a part of 21the proposition submitted, an estimate of the approximate 22amount extendable under the proposed rate and of the 23approximate amount extendable under the rate otherwise 24applicable to the next taxes to be extended, such amounts 25being computed upon the last known equalized assessed value; 26provided, that any error, miscalculation or inaccuracy in   HB4365 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1computing such amounts shall not invalidate or affect the 2validity of any tax rate limit so adopted.3    If a majority of all ballots cast on such proposition 4shall be in favor of the proposition, the tax rate limit so 5established shall become effective with the levy next 6following the referendum; provided that nothing in this 7subsection shall be construed as precluding the extension of 8taxes at rates less than that authorized by such referendum.9    Except as herein otherwise provided, the referenda 10authorized by the terms of this subsection shall be conducted 11in all respects in the manner provided by the general election 12law.13(Source: P.A. 95-723, eff. 6-23-08; 96-1070, eff. 1-1-11.) 14    Section 40. The Public Utilities Act is amended by 15changing Section 5-106 as follows: 16    (220 ILCS 5/5-106)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 5-106)17    Sec. 5-106. Each public utility shall have an office in 18one of the cities, villages or incorporated towns in this 19State in which its property or some part thereof is located, 20and shall keep in said office all such books, accounts, 21papers, records and memoranda as shall be ordered by the 22Commission to be kept within the State. The address of such 23office shall be filed with the Commission. No books, accounts, 24papers, records or memoranda ordered by the Commission to be   HB4365 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1kept within the State shall be at any time removed from the 2State, except upon such conditions as may be prescribed by the 3Commission.4    Each public utility shall be liable for, and upon proper 5invoice from the Commission shall promptly reimburse the 6Commission for, the reasonable costs and expenses associated 7with the audit or inspection of any books, accounts, papers, 8records and memoranda kept outside the State.9    In the case of a public utility that provides drinking 10water services, upon the request of a municipal wastewater 11agency or unit of local government organized under the 12Sanitary District Act of 1907, the North Shore Water 13Reclamation District Act, the Sanitary District Act of 1917, 14the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act, the Sanitary 15District Act of 1936, the Metro-East Flood Prevention District 16Act Metro-East Sanitary District Act of 1974, or the Eastern 17Will Sanitary District Act, such public utility shall provide 18timely and accurate water usage data, in a format identifiable 19to the requester, for purposes of calculating wastewater 20billings. The public utility shall be entitled to collect its 21reasonable costs incurred to provide such data. 22(Source: P.A. 103-716, eff. 1-1-25.) 23    Section 45. The Eminent Domain Act is amended by changing 24Section 15-5-15 as follows:   HB4365 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    (735 ILCS 30/15-5-15)2    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-457)3    Sec. 15-5-15. Eminent domain powers in ILCS Chapters 70 4through 75. The following provisions of law may include 5express grants of the power to acquire property by 6condemnation or eminent domain: 7(70 ILCS 5/8.02 and 5/9); Airport Authorities Act; airport 8    authorities; for public airport facilities.9(70 ILCS 5/8.05 and 5/9); Airport Authorities Act; airport 10    authorities; for removal of airport hazards.11(70 ILCS 5/8.06 and 5/9); Airport Authorities Act; airport 12    authorities; for reduction of the height of objects or 13    structures.14(70 ILCS 10/4); Interstate Airport Authorities Act; interstate 15    airport authorities; for general purposes.16(70 ILCS 15/3); Kankakee River Valley Area Airport Authority 17    Act; Kankakee River Valley Area Airport Authority; for 18    acquisition of land for airports.19(70 ILCS 200/2-20); Civic Center Code; civic center 20    authorities; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.21(70 ILCS 200/5-35); Civic Center Code; Aledo Civic Center 22    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.23(70 ILCS 200/10-15); Civic Center Code; Aurora Metropolitan 24    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for 25    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.  HB4365 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1(70 ILCS 200/15-40); Civic Center Code; Benton Civic Center 2    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.3(70 ILCS 200/20-15); Civic Center Code; Bloomington Civic 4    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 5    parking.6(70 ILCS 200/35-35); Civic Center Code; Brownstown Park 7    District Civic Center Authority; for grounds, centers, 8    buildings, and parking.9(70 ILCS 200/40-35); Civic Center Code; Carbondale Civic 10    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 11    parking.12(70 ILCS 200/55-60); Civic Center Code; Chicago South Civic 13    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 14    parking.15(70 ILCS 200/60-30); Civic Center Code; Collinsville 16    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 17    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.18(70 ILCS 200/70-35); Civic Center Code; Crystal Lake Civic 19    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 20    parking.21(70 ILCS 200/75-20); Civic Center Code; Decatur Metropolitan 22    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for 23    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.24(70 ILCS 200/80-15); Civic Center Code; DuPage County 25    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 26    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.  HB4365 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1(70 ILCS 200/85-35); Civic Center Code; Elgin Metropolitan 2    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for 3    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.4(70 ILCS 200/95-25); Civic Center Code; Herrin Metropolitan 5    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for 6    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.7(70 ILCS 200/110-35); Civic Center Code; Illinois Valley Civic 8    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 9    parking.10(70 ILCS 200/115-35); Civic Center Code; Jasper County Civic 11    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 12    parking.13(70 ILCS 200/120-25); Civic Center Code; Jefferson County 14    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 15    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.16(70 ILCS 200/125-15); Civic Center Code; Jo Daviess County 17    Civic Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, 18    and parking.19(70 ILCS 200/130-30); Civic Center Code; Katherine Dunham 20    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 21    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.22(70 ILCS 200/145-35); Civic Center Code; Marengo Civic Center 23    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.24(70 ILCS 200/150-35); Civic Center Code; Mason County Civic 25    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 26    parking.  HB4365 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1(70 ILCS 200/155-15); Civic Center Code; Matteson Metropolitan 2    Civic Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, 3    and parking.4(70 ILCS 200/160-35); Civic Center Code; Maywood Civic Center 5    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.6(70 ILCS 200/165-35); Civic Center Code; Melrose Park 7    Metropolitan Exposition Auditorium and Office Building 8    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.9(70 ILCS 200/170-20); Civic Center Code; certain Metropolitan 10    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authorities; 11    for general purposes.12(70 ILCS 200/180-35); Civic Center Code; Normal Civic Center 13    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.14(70 ILCS 200/185-15); Civic Center Code; Oak Park Civic Center 15    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.16(70 ILCS 200/195-35); Civic Center Code; Ottawa Civic Center 17    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.18(70 ILCS 200/200-15); Civic Center Code; Pekin Civic Center 19    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.20(70 ILCS 200/205-15); Civic Center Code; Peoria Civic Center 21    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.22(70 ILCS 200/210-35); Civic Center Code; Pontiac Civic Center 23    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.24(70 ILCS 200/215-15); Civic Center Code; Illinois Quad City 25    Civic Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, 26    and parking.  HB4365 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1(70 ILCS 200/220-30); Civic Center Code; Quincy Metropolitan 2    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for 3    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.4(70 ILCS 200/225-35); Civic Center Code; Randolph County Civic 5    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 6    parking.7(70 ILCS 200/230-35); Civic Center Code; River Forest 8    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 9    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.10(70 ILCS 200/235-40); Civic Center Code; Riverside Civic 11    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 12    parking.13(70 ILCS 200/245-35); Civic Center Code; Salem Civic Center 14    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.15(70 ILCS 200/255-20); Civic Center Code; Springfield 16    Metropolitan Exposition and Auditorium Authority; for 17    grounds, centers, and parking.18(70 ILCS 200/260-35); Civic Center Code; Sterling Metropolitan 19    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for 20    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.21(70 ILCS 200/265-20); Civic Center Code; Vermilion County 22    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 23    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.24(70 ILCS 200/270-35); Civic Center Code; Waukegan Civic Center 25    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.26(70 ILCS 200/275-35); Civic Center Code; West Frankfort Civic   HB4365 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 2    parking.3(70 ILCS 200/280-20); Civic Center Code; Will County 4    Metropolitan Exposition and Auditorium Authority; for 5    grounds, centers, and parking.6(70 ILCS 210/5); Metropolitan Pier and Exposition Authority 7    Act; Metropolitan Pier and Exposition Authority; for 8    general purposes, including quick-take power.9(70 ILCS 405/22.04); Soil and Water Conservation Districts 10    Act; soil and water conservation districts; for general 11    purposes.12(70 ILCS 410/10 and 410/12); Conservation District Act; 13    conservation districts; for open space, wildland, scenic 14    roadway, pathway, outdoor recreation, or other 15    conservation benefits.16(70 ILCS 503/25); Chanute-Rantoul National Aviation Center 17    Redevelopment Commission Act; Chanute-Rantoul National 18    Aviation Center Redevelopment Commission; for general 19    purposes.20(70 ILCS 507/15); Fort Sheridan Redevelopment Commission Act; 21    Fort Sheridan Redevelopment Commission; for general 22    purposes or to carry out comprehensive or redevelopment 23    plans.24(70 ILCS 520/8); Southwestern Illinois Development Authority 25    Act; Southwestern Illinois Development Authority; for 26    general purposes, including quick-take power.  HB4365 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1(70 ILCS 605/4-17 and 605/5-7); Illinois Drainage Code; 2    drainage districts; for general purposes.3(70 ILCS 615/5 and 615/6); Chicago Drainage District Act; 4    corporate authorities; for construction and maintenance of 5    works.6(70 ILCS 705/10); Fire Protection District Act; fire 7    protection districts; for general purposes.8(70 ILCS 750/20); Flood Prevention District Act; flood 9    prevention districts; for general purposes.10(70 ILCS 805/6); Downstate Forest Preserve District Act; 11    certain forest preserve districts; for general purposes.12(70 ILCS 805/18.8); Downstate Forest Preserve District Act; 13    certain forest preserve districts; for recreational and 14    cultural facilities.15(70 ILCS 810/8); Cook County Forest Preserve District Act; 16    Forest Preserve District of Cook County; for general 17    purposes.18(70 ILCS 810/38); Cook County Forest Preserve District Act; 19    Forest Preserve District of Cook County; for recreational 20    facilities.21(70 ILCS 910/15 and 910/16); Hospital District Law; hospital 22    districts; for hospitals or hospital facilities.23(70 ILCS 915/3); Illinois Medical District Act; Illinois 24    Medical District Commission; for general purposes.25(70 ILCS 915/4.5); Illinois Medical District Act; Illinois 26    Medical District Commission; quick-take power for the   HB4365 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    Illinois State Police Forensic Science Laboratory 2    (obsolete).3(70 ILCS 920/5); Tuberculosis Sanitarium District Act; 4    tuberculosis sanitarium districts; for tuberculosis 5    sanitariums.6(70 ILCS 925/20); Mid-Illinois Medical District Act; 7    Mid-Illinois Medical District; for general purposes.8(70 ILCS 930/20); Mid-America Medical District Act; 9    Mid-America Medical District Commission; for general 10    purposes.11(70 ILCS 935/20); Roseland Community Medical District Act; 12    medical district; for general purposes.13(70 ILCS 1005/7); Mosquito Abatement District Act; mosquito 14    abatement districts; for general purposes.15(70 ILCS 1105/8); Museum District Act; museum districts; for 16    general purposes.17(70 ILCS 1205/7-1); Park District Code; park districts; for 18    streets and other purposes.19(70 ILCS 1205/8-1); Park District Code; park districts; for 20    parks.21(70 ILCS 1205/9-2 and 1205/9-4); Park District Code; park 22    districts; for airports and landing fields.23(70 ILCS 1205/11-2 and 1205/11-3); Park District Code; park 24    districts; for State land abutting public water and 25    certain access rights.26(70 ILCS 1205/11.1-3); Park District Code; park districts; for   HB4365 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    harbors.2(70 ILCS 1225/2); Park Commissioners Land Condemnation Act; 3    park districts; for street widening.4(70 ILCS 1230/1 and 1230/1-a); Park Commissioners Water 5    Control Act; park districts; for parks, boulevards, 6    driveways, parkways, viaducts, bridges, or tunnels.7(70 ILCS 1250/2); Park Commissioners Street Control (1889) 8    Act; park districts; for boulevards or driveways.9(70 ILCS 1290/1); Park District Aquarium and Museum Act; 10    municipalities or park districts; for aquariums or 11    museums.12(70 ILCS 1305/2); Park District Airport Zoning Act; park 13    districts; for restriction of the height of structures.14(70 ILCS 1310/5); Park District Elevated Highway Act; park 15    districts; for elevated highways.16(70 ILCS 1505/15); Chicago Park District Act; Chicago Park 17    District; for parks and other purposes.18(70 ILCS 1505/25.1); Chicago Park District Act; Chicago Park 19    District; for parking lots or garages.20(70 ILCS 1505/26.3); Chicago Park District Act; Chicago Park 21    District; for harbors.22(70 ILCS 1570/5); Lincoln Park Commissioners Land Condemnation 23    Act; Lincoln Park Commissioners; for land and interests in 24    land, including riparian rights.25(70 ILCS 1801/30); Alexander-Cairo Port District Act; 26    Alexander-Cairo Port District; for general purposes.  HB4365 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1(70 ILCS 1805/8); Havana Regional Port District Act; Havana 2    Regional Port District; for general purposes.3(70 ILCS 1810/7); Illinois International Port District Act; 4    Illinois International Port District; for general 5    purposes.6(70 ILCS 1815/13); Illinois Valley Regional Port District Act; 7    Illinois Valley Regional Port District; for general 8    purposes.9(70 ILCS 1820/4); Jackson-Union Counties Regional Port 10    District Act; Jackson-Union Counties Regional Port 11    District; for removal of airport hazards or reduction of 12    the height of objects or structures.13(70 ILCS 1820/5); Jackson-Union Counties Regional Port 14    District Act; Jackson-Union Counties Regional Port 15    District; for general purposes.16(70 ILCS 1825/4.9); Joliet Regional Port District Act; Joliet 17    Regional Port District; for removal of airport hazards.18(70 ILCS 1825/4.10); Joliet Regional Port District Act; Joliet 19    Regional Port District; for reduction of the height of 20    objects or structures.21(70 ILCS 1825/4.18); Joliet Regional Port District Act; Joliet 22    Regional Port District; for removal of hazards from ports 23    and terminals.24(70 ILCS 1825/5); Joliet Regional Port District Act; Joliet 25    Regional Port District; for general purposes.26(70 ILCS 1830/7.1); Kaskaskia Regional Port District Act;   HB4365 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    Kaskaskia Regional Port District; for removal of hazards 2    from ports and terminals.3(70 ILCS 1830/14); Kaskaskia Regional Port District Act; 4    Kaskaskia Regional Port District; for general purposes.5(70 ILCS 1831/30); Massac-Metropolis Port District Act; 6    Massac-Metropolis Port District; for general purposes.7(70 ILCS 1835/5.10); Mt. Carmel Regional Port District Act; 8    Mt. Carmel Regional Port District; for removal of airport 9    hazards.10(70 ILCS 1837/30); Ottawa Port District Act; Ottawa Port 11    District; for general purposes.12(70 ILCS 1842/30 and 1842/35); Rock Island Regional Port 13    District Act; Rock Island Regional Port District and 14    participating municipalities; for general Port District 15    purposes. 16(70 ILCS 1845/4.9); Seneca Regional Port District Act; Seneca 17    Regional Port District; for removal of airport hazards.18(70 ILCS 1845/4.10); Seneca Regional Port District Act; Seneca 19    Regional Port District; for reduction of the height of 20    objects or structures.21(70 ILCS 1845/5); Seneca Regional Port District Act; Seneca 22    Regional Port District; for general purposes.23(70 ILCS 1850/4); Shawneetown Regional Port District Act; 24    Shawneetown Regional Port District; for removal of airport 25    hazards or reduction of the height of objects or 26    structures.  HB4365 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1(70 ILCS 1850/5); Shawneetown Regional Port District Act; 2    Shawneetown Regional Port District; for general purposes.3(70 ILCS 1860/4); Tri-City Regional Port District Act; 4    Tri-City Regional Port District; for removal of airport 5    hazards.6(70 ILCS 1860/5); Tri-City Regional Port District Act; 7    Tri-City Regional Port District; for the development of 8    facilities.9(70 ILCS 1863/11); Upper Mississippi River International Port 10    District Act; Upper Mississippi River International Port 11    District; for general purposes.12(70 ILCS 1865/4.9); Waukegan Port District Act; Waukegan Port 13    District; for removal of airport hazards.14(70 ILCS 1865/4.10); Waukegan Port District Act; Waukegan Port 15    District; for restricting the height of objects or 16    structures.17(70 ILCS 1865/5); Waukegan Port District Act; Waukegan Port 18    District; for the development of facilities.19(70 ILCS 1905/16); Railroad Terminal Authority Act; Railroad 20    Terminal Authority (Chicago); for general purposes.21(70 ILCS 2105/9b); River Conservancy Districts Act; river 22    conservancy districts; for general purposes.23(70 ILCS 2105/10a); River Conservancy Districts Act; river 24    conservancy districts; for corporate purposes.25(70 ILCS 2205/15); Sanitary District Act of 1907; sanitary 26    districts; for corporate purposes.  HB4365 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1(70 ILCS 2205/18); Sanitary District Act of 1907; sanitary 2    districts; for improvements and works.3(70 ILCS 2205/19); Sanitary District Act of 1907; sanitary 4    districts; for access to property.5(70 ILCS 2305/8); North Shore Water Reclamation District Act; 6    North Shore Water Reclamation District; for corporate 7    purposes.8(70 ILCS 2305/15); North Shore Water Reclamation District Act; 9    North Shore Water Reclamation District; for improvements.10(70 ILCS 2405/7.9); Sanitary District Act of 1917; Sanitary 11    District of Decatur; for carrying out agreements to sell, 12    convey, or disburse treated wastewater to a private 13    entity.14(70 ILCS 2405/8); Sanitary District Act of 1917; sanitary 15    districts; for corporate purposes.16(70 ILCS 2405/15); Sanitary District Act of 1917; sanitary 17    districts; for improvements.18(70 ILCS 2405/16.9 and 2405/16.10); Sanitary District Act of 19    1917; sanitary districts; for waterworks.20(70 ILCS 2405/17.2); Sanitary District Act of 1917; sanitary 21    districts; for public sewer and water utility treatment 22    works.23(70 ILCS 2405/18); Sanitary District Act of 1917; sanitary 24    districts; for dams or other structures to regulate water 25    flow.26(70 ILCS 2605/8); Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act;   HB4365 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    Metropolitan Water Reclamation District; for corporate 2    purposes.3(70 ILCS 2605/16); Metropolitan Water Reclamation District 4    Act; Metropolitan Water Reclamation District; quick-take 5    power for improvements.6(70 ILCS 2605/17); Metropolitan Water Reclamation District 7    Act; Metropolitan Water Reclamation District; for bridges.8(70 ILCS 2605/35); Metropolitan Water Reclamation District 9    Act; Metropolitan Water Reclamation District; for widening 10    and deepening a navigable stream.11(70 ILCS 2805/10); Sanitary District Act of 1936; sanitary 12    districts; for corporate purposes.13(70 ILCS 2805/24); Sanitary District Act of 1936; sanitary 14    districts; for improvements.15(70 ILCS 2805/26i and 2805/26j); Sanitary District Act of 16    1936; sanitary districts; for drainage systems.17(70 ILCS 2805/27); Sanitary District Act of 1936; sanitary 18    districts; for dams or other structures to regulate water 19    flow.20(70 ILCS 2805/32k); Sanitary District Act of 1936; sanitary 21    districts; for water supply.22(70 ILCS 2805/32l); Sanitary District Act of 1936; sanitary 23    districts; for waterworks.24(70 ILCS 2905/2-7); Metro-East Flood Prevention District Act 25    Metro-East Sanitary District Act of 1974; Metro-East Flood 26    Prevention District Metro-East Sanitary District; for   HB4365 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    corporate purposes.2(70 ILCS 2905/2-8); Metro-East Flood Prevention District Act 3    Metro-East Sanitary District Act of 1974; Metro-East Flood 4    Prevention District Metro-East Sanitary District; for 5    access to property.6(70 ILCS 3010/10); Sanitary District Revenue Bond Act; 7    sanitary districts; for sewerage systems.8(70 ILCS 3205/12); Illinois Sports Facilities Authority Act; 9    Illinois Sports Facilities Authority; quick-take power for 10    its corporate purposes (obsolete).11(70 ILCS 3405/16); Surface Water Protection District Act; 12    surface water protection districts; for corporate 13    purposes.14(70 ILCS 3605/7); Metropolitan Transit Authority Act; Chicago 15    Transit Authority; for transportation systems.16(70 ILCS 3605/8); Metropolitan Transit Authority Act; Chicago 17    Transit Authority; for general purposes.18(70 ILCS 3605/10); Metropolitan Transit Authority Act; Chicago 19    Transit Authority; for general purposes, including 20    railroad property.21(70 ILCS 3610/3 and 3610/5); Local Mass Transit District Act; 22    local mass transit districts; for general purposes.23(70 ILCS 3615/2.13); Regional Transportation Authority Act; 24    Regional Transportation Authority; for general purposes.25(70 ILCS 3705/8 and 3705/12); Public Water District Act; 26    public water districts; for waterworks.  HB4365 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1(70 ILCS 3705/23a); Public Water District Act; public water 2    districts; for sewerage properties.3(70 ILCS 3705/23e); Public Water District Act; public water 4    districts; for combined waterworks and sewerage systems.5(70 ILCS 3715/6); Water Authorities Act; water authorities; 6    for facilities to ensure adequate water supply.7(70 ILCS 3715/27); Water Authorities Act; water authorities; 8    for access to property.9(75 ILCS 5/4-7); Illinois Local Library Act; boards of library 10    trustees; for library buildings.11(75 ILCS 16/30-55.80); Public Library District Act of 1991; 12    public library districts; for general purposes.13(75 ILCS 65/1 and 65/3); Libraries in Parks Act; corporate 14    authorities of city or park district, or board of park 15    commissioners; for free public library buildings.16(Source: 104-435, eff. 11-21-25; 104-454, eff. 12-12-25; 17revised 1-8-26.) 18    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-457)19    Sec. 15-5-15. Eminent domain powers in ILCS Chapters 70 20through 75. The following provisions of law may include 21express grants of the power to acquire property by 22condemnation or eminent domain: 23(70 ILCS 5/8.02 and 5/9); Airport Authorities Act; airport 24    authorities; for public airport facilities.  HB4365 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1(70 ILCS 5/8.05 and 5/9); Airport Authorities Act; airport 2    authorities; for removal of airport hazards.3(70 ILCS 5/8.06 and 5/9); Airport Authorities Act; airport 4    authorities; for reduction of the height of objects or 5    structures.6(70 ILCS 10/4); Interstate Airport Authorities Act; interstate 7    airport authorities; for general purposes.8(70 ILCS 15/3); Kankakee River Valley Area Airport Authority 9    Act; Kankakee River Valley Area Airport Authority; for 10    acquisition of land for airports.11(70 ILCS 200/2-20); Civic Center Code; civic center 12    authorities; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.13(70 ILCS 200/5-35); Civic Center Code; Aledo Civic Center 14    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.15(70 ILCS 200/10-15); Civic Center Code; Aurora Metropolitan 16    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for 17    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.18(70 ILCS 200/15-40); Civic Center Code; Benton Civic Center 19    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.20(70 ILCS 200/20-15); Civic Center Code; Bloomington Civic 21    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 22    parking.23(70 ILCS 200/35-35); Civic Center Code; Brownstown Park 24    District Civic Center Authority; for grounds, centers, 25    buildings, and parking.26(70 ILCS 200/40-35); Civic Center Code; Carbondale Civic   HB4365 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 2    parking.3(70 ILCS 200/55-60); Civic Center Code; Chicago South Civic 4    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 5    parking.6(70 ILCS 200/60-30); Civic Center Code; Collinsville 7    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 8    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.9(70 ILCS 200/70-35); Civic Center Code; Crystal Lake Civic 10    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 11    parking.12(70 ILCS 200/75-20); Civic Center Code; Decatur Metropolitan 13    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for 14    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.15(70 ILCS 200/80-15); Civic Center Code; DuPage County 16    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 17    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.18(70 ILCS 200/85-35); Civic Center Code; Elgin Metropolitan 19    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for 20    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.21(70 ILCS 200/95-25); Civic Center Code; Herrin Metropolitan 22    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for 23    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.24(70 ILCS 200/110-35); Civic Center Code; Illinois Valley Civic 25    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 26    parking.  HB4365 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1(70 ILCS 200/115-35); Civic Center Code; Jasper County Civic 2    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 3    parking.4(70 ILCS 200/120-25); Civic Center Code; Jefferson County 5    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 6    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.7(70 ILCS 200/125-15); Civic Center Code; Jo Daviess County 8    Civic Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, 9    and parking.10(70 ILCS 200/130-30); Civic Center Code; Katherine Dunham 11    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 12    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.13(70 ILCS 200/145-35); Civic Center Code; Marengo Civic Center 14    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.15(70 ILCS 200/150-35); Civic Center Code; Mason County Civic 16    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 17    parking.18(70 ILCS 200/155-15); Civic Center Code; Matteson Metropolitan 19    Civic Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, 20    and parking.21(70 ILCS 200/160-35); Civic Center Code; Maywood Civic Center 22    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.23(70 ILCS 200/165-35); Civic Center Code; Melrose Park 24    Metropolitan Exposition Auditorium and Office Building 25    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.26(70 ILCS 200/170-20); Civic Center Code; certain Metropolitan   HB4365 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authorities; 2    for general purposes.3(70 ILCS 200/180-35); Civic Center Code; Normal Civic Center 4    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.5(70 ILCS 200/185-15); Civic Center Code; Oak Park Civic Center 6    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.7(70 ILCS 200/195-35); Civic Center Code; Ottawa Civic Center 8    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.9(70 ILCS 200/200-15); Civic Center Code; Pekin Civic Center 10    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.11(70 ILCS 200/205-15); Civic Center Code; Peoria Civic Center 12    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.13(70 ILCS 200/210-35); Civic Center Code; Pontiac Civic Center 14    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.15(70 ILCS 200/215-15); Civic Center Code; Illinois Quad City 16    Civic Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, 17    and parking.18(70 ILCS 200/220-30); Civic Center Code; Quincy Metropolitan 19    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for 20    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.21(70 ILCS 200/225-35); Civic Center Code; Randolph County Civic 22    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 23    parking.24(70 ILCS 200/230-35); Civic Center Code; River Forest 25    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 26    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.  HB4365 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1(70 ILCS 200/235-40); Civic Center Code; Riverside Civic 2    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 3    parking.4(70 ILCS 200/245-35); Civic Center Code; Salem Civic Center 5    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.6(70 ILCS 200/255-20); Civic Center Code; Springfield 7    Metropolitan Exposition and Auditorium Authority; for 8    grounds, centers, and parking.9(70 ILCS 200/260-35); Civic Center Code; Sterling Metropolitan 10    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for 11    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.12(70 ILCS 200/265-20); Civic Center Code; Vermilion County 13    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 14    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.15(70 ILCS 200/270-35); Civic Center Code; Waukegan Civic Center 16    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.17(70 ILCS 200/275-35); Civic Center Code; West Frankfort Civic 18    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 19    parking.20(70 ILCS 200/280-20); Civic Center Code; Will County 21    Metropolitan Exposition and Auditorium Authority; for 22    grounds, centers, and parking.23(70 ILCS 210/5); Metropolitan Pier and Exposition Authority 24    Act; Metropolitan Pier and Exposition Authority; for 25    general purposes, including quick-take power.26(70 ILCS 405/22.04); Soil and Water Conservation Districts   HB4365 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    Act; soil and water conservation districts; for general 2    purposes.3(70 ILCS 410/10 and 410/12); Conservation District Act; 4    conservation districts; for open space, wildland, scenic 5    roadway, pathway, outdoor recreation, or other 6    conservation benefits.7(70 ILCS 503/25); Chanute-Rantoul National Aviation Center 8    Redevelopment Commission Act; Chanute-Rantoul National 9    Aviation Center Redevelopment Commission; for general 10    purposes.11(70 ILCS 507/15); Fort Sheridan Redevelopment Commission Act; 12    Fort Sheridan Redevelopment Commission; for general 13    purposes or to carry out comprehensive or redevelopment 14    plans.15(70 ILCS 520/8); Southwestern Illinois Development Authority 16    Act; Southwestern Illinois Development Authority; for 17    general purposes, including quick-take power.18(70 ILCS 605/4-17 and 605/5-7); Illinois Drainage Code; 19    drainage districts; for general purposes.20(70 ILCS 615/5 and 615/6); Chicago Drainage District Act; 21    corporate authorities; for construction and maintenance of 22    works.23(70 ILCS 705/10); Fire Protection District Act; fire 24    protection districts; for general purposes.25(70 ILCS 750/20); Flood Prevention District Act; flood 26    prevention districts; for general purposes.  HB4365 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1(70 ILCS 805/6); Downstate Forest Preserve District Act; 2    certain forest preserve districts; for general purposes.3(70 ILCS 805/18.8); Downstate Forest Preserve District Act; 4    certain forest preserve districts; for recreational and 5    cultural facilities.6(70 ILCS 810/8); Cook County Forest Preserve District Act; 7    Forest Preserve District of Cook County; for general 8    purposes.9(70 ILCS 810/38); Cook County Forest Preserve District Act; 10    Forest Preserve District of Cook County; for recreational 11    facilities.12(70 ILCS 910/15 and 910/16); Hospital District Law; hospital 13    districts; for hospitals or hospital facilities.14(70 ILCS 915/3); Illinois Medical District Act; Illinois 15    Medical District Commission; for general purposes.16(70 ILCS 915/4.5); Illinois Medical District Act; Illinois 17    Medical District Commission; quick-take power for the 18    Illinois State Police Forensic Science Laboratory 19    (obsolete).20(70 ILCS 920/5); Tuberculosis Sanitarium District Act; 21    tuberculosis sanitarium districts; for tuberculosis 22    sanitariums.23(70 ILCS 925/20); Mid-Illinois Medical District Act; 24    Mid-Illinois Medical District; for general purposes.25(70 ILCS 930/20); Mid-America Medical District Act; 26    Mid-America Medical District Commission; for general   HB4365 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    purposes.2(70 ILCS 935/20); Roseland Community Medical District Act; 3    medical district; for general purposes.4(70 ILCS 1005/7); Mosquito Abatement District Act; mosquito 5    abatement districts; for general purposes.6(70 ILCS 1105/8); Museum District Act; museum districts; for 7    general purposes.8(70 ILCS 1205/7-1); Park District Code; park districts; for 9    streets and other purposes.10(70 ILCS 1205/8-1); Park District Code; park districts; for 11    parks.12(70 ILCS 1205/9-2 and 1205/9-4); Park District Code; park 13    districts; for airports and landing fields.14(70 ILCS 1205/11-2 and 1205/11-3); Park District Code; park 15    districts; for State land abutting public water and 16    certain access rights.17(70 ILCS 1205/11.1-3); Park District Code; park districts; for 18    harbors.19(70 ILCS 1225/2); Park Commissioners Land Condemnation Act; 20    park districts; for street widening.21(70 ILCS 1230/1 and 1230/1-a); Park Commissioners Water 22    Control Act; park districts; for parks, boulevards, 23    driveways, parkways, viaducts, bridges, or tunnels.24(70 ILCS 1250/2); Park Commissioners Street Control (1889) 25    Act; park districts; for boulevards or driveways.26(70 ILCS 1290/1); Park District Aquarium and Museum Act;   HB4365 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    municipalities or park districts; for aquariums or 2    museums.3(70 ILCS 1305/2); Park District Airport Zoning Act; park 4    districts; for restriction of the height of structures.5(70 ILCS 1310/5); Park District Elevated Highway Act; park 6    districts; for elevated highways.7(70 ILCS 1505/15); Chicago Park District Act; Chicago Park 8    District; for parks and other purposes.9(70 ILCS 1505/25.1); Chicago Park District Act; Chicago Park 10    District; for parking lots or garages.11(70 ILCS 1505/26.3); Chicago Park District Act; Chicago Park 12    District; for harbors.13(70 ILCS 1570/5); Lincoln Park Commissioners Land Condemnation 14    Act; Lincoln Park Commissioners; for land and interests in 15    land, including riparian rights.16(70 ILCS 1801/30); Alexander-Cairo Port District Act; 17    Alexander-Cairo Port District; for general purposes.18(70 ILCS 1805/8); Havana Regional Port District Act; Havana 19    Regional Port District; for general purposes.20(70 ILCS 1810/7); Illinois International Port District Act; 21    Illinois International Port District; for general 22    purposes.23(70 ILCS 1815/13); Illinois Valley Regional Port District Act; 24    Illinois Valley Regional Port District; for general 25    purposes.26(70 ILCS 1820/4); Jackson-Union Counties Regional Port   HB4365 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    District Act; Jackson-Union Counties Regional Port 2    District; for removal of airport hazards or reduction of 3    the height of objects or structures.4(70 ILCS 1820/5); Jackson-Union Counties Regional Port 5    District Act; Jackson-Union Counties Regional Port 6    District; for general purposes.7(70 ILCS 1825/4.9); Joliet Regional Port District Act; Joliet 8    Regional Port District; for removal of airport hazards.9(70 ILCS 1825/4.10); Joliet Regional Port District Act; Joliet 10    Regional Port District; for reduction of the height of 11    objects or structures.12(70 ILCS 1825/4.18); Joliet Regional Port District Act; Joliet 13    Regional Port District; for removal of hazards from ports 14    and terminals.15(70 ILCS 1825/5); Joliet Regional Port District Act; Joliet 16    Regional Port District; for general purposes.17(70 ILCS 1830/7.1); Kaskaskia Regional Port District Act; 18    Kaskaskia Regional Port District; for removal of hazards 19    from ports and terminals.20(70 ILCS 1830/14); Kaskaskia Regional Port District Act; 21    Kaskaskia Regional Port District; for general purposes.22(70 ILCS 1831/30); Massac-Metropolis Port District Act; 23    Massac-Metropolis Port District; for general purposes.24(70 ILCS 1835/5.10); Mt. Carmel Regional Port District Act; 25    Mt. Carmel Regional Port District; for removal of airport 26    hazards.  HB4365 Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1(70 ILCS 1837/30); Ottawa Port District Act; Ottawa Port 2    District; for general purposes.3(70 ILCS 1842/30 and 1842/35); Rock Island Regional Port 4    District Act; Rock Island Regional Port District and 5    participating municipalities; for general Port District 6    purposes. 7(70 ILCS 1845/4.9); Seneca Regional Port District Act; Seneca 8    Regional Port District; for removal of airport hazards.9(70 ILCS 1845/4.10); Seneca Regional Port District Act; Seneca 10    Regional Port District; for reduction of the height of 11    objects or structures.12(70 ILCS 1845/5); Seneca Regional Port District Act; Seneca 13    Regional Port District; for general purposes.14(70 ILCS 1850/4); Shawneetown Regional Port District Act; 15    Shawneetown Regional Port District; for removal of airport 16    hazards or reduction of the height of objects or 17    structures.18(70 ILCS 1850/5); Shawneetown Regional Port District Act; 19    Shawneetown Regional Port District; for general purposes.20(70 ILCS 1860/4); Tri-City Regional Port District Act; 21    Tri-City Regional Port District; for removal of airport 22    hazards.23(70 ILCS 1860/5); Tri-City Regional Port District Act; 24    Tri-City Regional Port District; for the development of 25    facilities.26(70 ILCS 1863/11); Upper Mississippi River International Port   HB4365 Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    District Act; Upper Mississippi River International Port 2    District; for general purposes.3(70 ILCS 1865/4.9); Waukegan Port District Act; Waukegan Port 4    District; for removal of airport hazards.5(70 ILCS 1865/4.10); Waukegan Port District Act; Waukegan Port 6    District; for restricting the height of objects or 7    structures.8(70 ILCS 1865/5); Waukegan Port District Act; Waukegan Port 9    District; for the development of facilities.10(70 ILCS 1905/16); Railroad Terminal Authority Act; Railroad 11    Terminal Authority (Chicago); for general purposes.12(70 ILCS 2105/9b); River Conservancy Districts Act; river 13    conservancy districts; for general purposes.14(70 ILCS 2105/10a); River Conservancy Districts Act; river 15    conservancy districts; for corporate purposes.16(70 ILCS 2205/15); Sanitary District Act of 1907; sanitary 17    districts; for corporate purposes.18(70 ILCS 2205/18); Sanitary District Act of 1907; sanitary 19    districts; for improvements and works.20(70 ILCS 2205/19); Sanitary District Act of 1907; sanitary 21    districts; for access to property.22(70 ILCS 2305/8); North Shore Water Reclamation District Act; 23    North Shore Water Reclamation District; for corporate 24    purposes.25(70 ILCS 2305/15); North Shore Water Reclamation District Act; 26    North Shore Water Reclamation District; for improvements.  HB4365 Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1(70 ILCS 2405/7.9); Sanitary District Act of 1917; Sanitary 2    District of Decatur; for carrying out agreements to sell, 3    convey, or disburse treated wastewater to a private 4    entity.5(70 ILCS 2405/8); Sanitary District Act of 1917; sanitary 6    districts; for corporate purposes.7(70 ILCS 2405/15); Sanitary District Act of 1917; sanitary 8    districts; for improvements.9(70 ILCS 2405/16.9 and 2405/16.10); Sanitary District Act of 10    1917; sanitary districts; for waterworks.11(70 ILCS 2405/17.2); Sanitary District Act of 1917; sanitary 12    districts; for public sewer and water utility treatment 13    works.14(70 ILCS 2405/18); Sanitary District Act of 1917; sanitary 15    districts; for dams or other structures to regulate water 16    flow.17(70 ILCS 2605/8); Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act; 18    Metropolitan Water Reclamation District; for corporate 19    purposes.20(70 ILCS 2605/16); Metropolitan Water Reclamation District 21    Act; Metropolitan Water Reclamation District; quick-take 22    power for improvements.23(70 ILCS 2605/17); Metropolitan Water Reclamation District 24    Act; Metropolitan Water Reclamation District; for bridges.25(70 ILCS 2605/35); Metropolitan Water Reclamation District 26    Act; Metropolitan Water Reclamation District; for widening   HB4365 Enrolled- 60 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    and deepening a navigable stream.2(70 ILCS 2805/10); Sanitary District Act of 1936; sanitary 3    districts; for corporate purposes.4(70 ILCS 2805/24); Sanitary District Act of 1936; sanitary 5    districts; for improvements.6(70 ILCS 2805/26i and 2805/26j); Sanitary District Act of 7    1936; sanitary districts; for drainage systems.8(70 ILCS 2805/27); Sanitary District Act of 1936; sanitary 9    districts; for dams or other structures to regulate water 10    flow.11(70 ILCS 2805/32k); Sanitary District Act of 1936; sanitary 12    districts; for water supply.13(70 ILCS 2805/32l); Sanitary District Act of 1936; sanitary 14    districts; for waterworks.15(70 ILCS 2905/2-7); Metro-East Flood Prevention District Act 16    Metro-East Sanitary District Act of 1974; Metro-East Flood 17    Prevention District Metro-East Sanitary District; for 18    corporate purposes.19(70 ILCS 2905/2-8); Metro-East Flood Prevention District Act 20    Metro-East Sanitary District Act of 1974; Metro-East Flood 21    Prevention District Metro-East Sanitary District; for 22    access to property.23(70 ILCS 3010/10); Sanitary District Revenue Bond Act; 24    sanitary districts; for sewerage systems.25(70 ILCS 3205/12); Illinois Sports Facilities Authority Act; 26    Illinois Sports Facilities Authority; quick-take power for   HB4365 Enrolled- 61 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    its corporate purposes (obsolete).2(70 ILCS 3405/16); Surface Water Protection District Act; 3    surface water protection districts; for corporate 4    purposes.5(70 ILCS 3605/7); Chicago Transit Authority Act; Chicago 6    Transit Authority; for transportation systems.7(70 ILCS 3605/8); Chicago Transit Authority Act; Chicago 8    Transit Authority; for general purposes.9(70 ILCS 3605/10); Chicago Transit Authority Act; Chicago 10    Transit Authority; for general purposes, including 11    railroad property.12(70 ILCS 3610/3 and 3610/5); Local Mass Transit District Act; 13    local mass transit districts; for general purposes.14(70 ILCS 3615/2.13); Northern Illinois Transit Authority Act; 15    Northern Illinois Transit Authority; for general purposes.16(70 ILCS 3705/8 and 3705/12); Public Water District Act; 17    public water districts; for waterworks.18(70 ILCS 3705/23a); Public Water District Act; public water 19    districts; for sewerage properties.20(70 ILCS 3705/23e); Public Water District Act; public water 21    districts; for combined waterworks and sewerage systems.22(70 ILCS 3715/6); Water Authorities Act; water authorities; 23    for facilities to ensure adequate water supply.24(70 ILCS 3715/27); Water Authorities Act; water authorities; 25    for access to property.26(75 ILCS 5/4-7); Illinois Local Library Act; boards of library   HB4365 Enrolled- 62 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    trustees; for library buildings.2(75 ILCS 16/30-55.80); Public Library District Act of 1991; 3    public library districts; for general purposes.4(75 ILCS 65/1 and 65/3); Libraries in Parks Act; corporate 5    authorities of city or park district, or board of park 6    commissioners; for free public library buildings.7(Source: 104-435, eff. 11-21-25; 104-454, eff. 12-12-25; 8104-457, Article 5, Section 5-925, eff. 6-1-26; 104-457, 9Article 10, Section 10-75, eff. 6-1-26; 104-457, Article 15, 10Section 15-210, eff. 6-1-26; revised 1-8-26.) 11    Section 50. The Local Governmental and Governmental 12Employees Tort Immunity Act is amended by changing Section 139-107 as follows: 14    (745 ILCS 10/9-107)  (from Ch. 85, par. 9-107)15    Sec. 9-107. Policy; tax levy. 16    (a) The General Assembly finds that the purpose of this 17Section is to provide an extraordinary tax for funding 18expenses relating to (i) tort liability, (ii) liability 19relating to actions brought under the federal Comprehensive 20Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 211980 or the Environmental Protection Act, but only until 22December 31, 2010, (iii) insurance, and (iv) risk management 23programs. Thus, the tax has been excluded from various 24limitations otherwise applicable to tax levies.   HB4365 Enrolled- 63 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1Notwithstanding the extraordinary nature of the tax authorized 2by this Section, however, it has become apparent that some 3units of local government are using the tax revenue to fund 4expenses more properly paid from general operating funds. 5These uses of the revenue are inconsistent with the limited 6purpose of the tax authorization.7    Therefore, the General Assembly declares, as a matter of 8policy, that (i) the use of the tax revenue authorized by this 9Section for purposes not expressly authorized under this Act 10is improper and (ii) the provisions of this Section shall be 11strictly construed consistent with this declaration and the 12Act's express purposes.13    (b) A local public entity may annually levy or have levied 14on its behalf taxes upon all taxable property within its 15territory at a rate that will produce a sum that will be 16sufficient to: (i) pay the cost of insurance, individual or 17joint self-insurance (including reserves thereon), including 18all operating and administrative costs and expenses directly 19associated therewith, claims services and risk management 20directly attributable to loss prevention and loss reduction, 21legal services directly attributable to the insurance, 22self-insurance, or joint self-insurance program, and 23educational, inspectional, and supervisory services directly 24relating to loss prevention and loss reduction, participation 25in a reciprocal insurer as provided in Sections 72, 76, and 81 26of the Illinois Insurance Code, or participation in a   HB4365 Enrolled- 64 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1reciprocal insurer, all as provided in settlements or 2judgments under Section 9-102, including all costs and 3reserves directly attributable to being a member of an 4insurance pool, under Section 9-103; (ii) pay the costs of and 5principal and interest on bonds issued under Section 9-105; 6(iii) pay judgments and settlements under Section 9-104 of 7this Act; (iv) discharge obligations under Section 34-18.1 of 8the School Code or make transfers under Section 17-2A of the 9School Code; (v) pay judgments and settlements under the 10federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, 11and Liability Act of 1980 and the Environmental Protection 12Act, but only until December 31, 2010; (vi) pay the costs 13authorized by the Metro-East Flood Prevention District Act 14Metro-East Sanitary District Act of 1974 as provided in 15subsection (a) of Section 5-1 of that Act; and (vii) pay the 16cost of risk management programs. Provided it complies with 17any other applicable statutory requirements, the local public 18entity may self-insure and establish reserves for expected 19losses for any property damage or for any liability or loss for 20which the local public entity is authorized to levy or have 21levied on its behalf taxes for the purchase of insurance or the 22payment of judgments or settlements under this Section. The 23decision of the board to establish a reserve shall be based on 24reasonable actuarial or insurance underwriting evidence and 25subject to the limits and reporting provisions in Section 269-103.  HB4365 Enrolled- 65 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    If a school district was a member of a 2joint-self-health-insurance cooperative that had more 3liability in outstanding claims than revenue to pay those 4claims, the school board of that district may by resolution 5make a one-time transfer from any fund in which tort immunity 6moneys are maintained to the fund or funds from which payments 7to a joint-self-health-insurance cooperative can be or have 8been made of an amount not to exceed the amount of the 9liability claim that the school district owes to the 10joint-self-health-insurance cooperative or that the school 11district paid within the 2 years immediately preceding the 12effective date of this amendatory Act of the 92nd General 13Assembly.14    Funds raised pursuant to this Section shall, unless 15lawfully transferred as provided in Section 17-2A of the 16School Code, only be used for the purposes specified in this 17Act, including protection against and reduction of any 18liability or loss described hereinabove and under Federal or 19State common or statutory law, the Workers' Compensation Act, 20the Workers' Occupational Diseases Act and the Unemployment 21Insurance Act. Funds raised pursuant to this Section may be 22invested in any manner in which other funds of local public 23entities may be invested under Section 2 of the Public Funds 24Investment Act. Interest on such funds shall be used only for 25purposes for which the funds can be used or, if surplus, must 26be used for abatement of property taxes levied by the local   HB4365 Enrolled- 66 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1taxing entity.2    A local public entity may enter into intergovernmental 3contracts with a term of not to exceed 12 years for the 4provision of joint self-insurance which contracts may include 5an obligation to pay a proportional share of a general 6obligation or revenue bond or other debt instrument issued by 7a local public entity which is a party to the 8intergovernmental contract and is authorized by the terms of 9the contract to issue the bond or other debt instrument. Funds 10due under such contracts shall not be considered debt under 11any constitutional or statutory limitation and the local 12public entity may levy or have levied on its behalf taxes to 13pay for its proportional share under the contract. Funds 14raised pursuant to intergovernmental contracts for the 15provision of joint self-insurance may only be used for the 16payment of any cost, liability or loss against which a local 17public entity may protect itself or self-insure pursuant to 18Section 9-103 or for the payment of which such entity may levy 19a tax pursuant to this Section, including tort judgments or 20settlements, costs associated with the issuance, retirement or 21refinancing of the bonds or other debt instruments, the 22repayment of the principal or interest of the bonds or other 23debt instruments, the costs of the administration of the joint 24self-insurance fund, consultant, and risk care management 25programs or the costs of insurance. Any surplus returned to 26the local public entity under the terms of the   HB4365 Enrolled- 67 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1intergovernmental contract shall be used only for purposes set 2forth in subsection (a) of Section 9-103 and Section 9-107 or 3for abatement of property taxes levied by the local taxing 4entity.5    Any tax levied under this Section shall be levied and 6collected in like manner with the general taxes of the entity 7and shall be exclusive of and in addition to the amount of tax 8that entity is now or may hereafter be authorized to levy for 9general purposes under any statute which may limit the amount 10of tax which that entity may levy for general purposes. The 11county clerk of the county in which any part of the territory 12of the local taxing entity is located, in reducing tax levies 13under the provisions of any Act concerning the levy and 14extension of taxes, shall not consider any tax provided for by 15this Section as a part of the general tax levy for the purposes 16of the entity nor include such tax within any limitation of the 17percent of the assessed valuation upon which taxes are 18required to be extended for such entity.19    With respect to taxes levied under this Section, either 20before, on, or after the effective date of this amendatory Act 21of 1994:22        (1) Those taxes are excepted from and shall not be 23    included within the rate limitation imposed by law on 24    taxes levied for general corporate purposes by the local 25    public entity authorized to levy a tax under this Section.26        (2) Those taxes that a local public entity has levied   HB4365 Enrolled- 68 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1    in reliance on this Section and that are excepted under 2    paragraph (1) from the rate limitation imposed by law on 3    taxes levied for general corporate purposes by the local 4    public entity are not invalid because of any provision of 5    the law authorizing the local public entity's tax levy for 6    general corporate purposes that may be construed or may 7    have been construed to restrict or limit those taxes 8    levied, and those taxes are hereby validated. This 9    validation of taxes levied applies to all cases pending on 10    or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 11    1994.12        (3) Paragraphs (1) and (2) do not apply to a hospital 13    organized under Article 170 or 175 of the Township Code, 14    under the Town Hospital Act, or under the Township 15    Non-Sectarian Hospital Act and do not give any authority 16    to levy taxes on behalf of such a hospital in excess of the 17    rate limitation imposed by law on taxes levied for general 18    corporate purposes. A hospital organized under Article 170 19    or 175 of the Township Code, under the Town Hospital Act, 20    or under the Township Non-Sectarian Hospital Act is not 21    prohibited from levying taxes in support of tort liability 22    bonds if the taxes do not cause the hospital's aggregate 23    tax rate from exceeding the rate limitation imposed by law 24    on taxes levied for general corporate purposes.25    Revenues derived from such tax shall be paid to the 26treasurer of the local taxing entity as collected and used for   HB4365 Enrolled- 69 -LRB104 17396 RTM 30821 b1the purposes of this Section and of Section 9-102, 9-103, 29-104 or 9-105, as the case may be. If payments on account of 3such taxes are insufficient during any year to meet such 4purposes, the entity may issue tax anticipation warrants 5against the current tax levy in the manner provided by 6statute.7(Source: P.A. 99-922, eff. 1-17-17.) 8    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 9changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 10that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 11represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 12not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 13made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 14Public Act.